Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2524
Fees.

The department shall establish and collect fees for credentialing activities under the Occupational Therapy Practice Act as provided in sections 38-151 to 38-157.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 42;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 63;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 177;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 92;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 78;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 143;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-6114;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 864.